West Virginia, session 2026, HB5619.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. STATE BUILDINGS. §5-6-17.  Display of  the national motto, and POW-MIA flag, and the Ten Commandments. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that the national motto of "In God We Trust," is an important part of our country’s history and heritage. Additionally, the POW-MIA flag is a symbol of citizen concern for U.S. military personnel taken as prisoners of war (POW) or listed as missing in action (MIA). These patriotic displays enhance our national pride and awareness, both of the sacrifices made by service members and our heritage as Americans.(b) (1) The governing authority of any public property, public buildings and any building, designed, constructed and maintained with public funds from the state, a county or a municipality may, shall, if funds are available, prominently display on the property or building, the American national motto, "In God We Trust." (2) A durable poster or framed copy of the national motto of the United States, "In God We Trust" shall:(A) Be easily readable on a poster or framed copy of at least eleven inches by fourteen inches (11″ x 14″);(B) Be the central focus of the poster or framed copy; and(C) Be displayed in a large font size;(D)  Include an accurate representation of the United States flag, which shall be under the national motto; and (E ) An accurate representation of the West Virginia State flag.(3) Costs associated with the display of the motto may be paid with any private donations, gifts, grants and bequests received by the governing authority.(c) The governing authority of any public property, public buildings and any building, designed, constructed and maintained with public funds from the state, a county or a municipality may prominently display on the property or building, the POW-MIA flag in the same manner as prescribed by this code for the required display of national and state flags. Costs associated with the display of the POW-MIA flag may be paid with any private donations, gifts, grants and bequests received by the governing authority.(d) (1) The governing authority of any public property, public buildings and any building, designed, constructed and maintained with public funds from the state, a county or a municipality may, shall, if funds are available, prominently display on the property or building, a durable poster or framed copy of a historical	representation of the Ten Commandments.(2) A durable poster or framed copy of a historical representation of the Ten Commandments and copy of a historical representation of the Ten Commandments shall:(A) Include the text of the Ten Commandments in a size and typeface that is legible to a person with average vision from anywhere in the room in which the durable poster or framed copy is displayed; and(B) Be at least sixteen inches by twenty inches (16" x 20").(3) The text of the durable poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments shall read as follows:"The Ten CommandmentsI am the Lord thy God.Thou shalt have no other gods before me.Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.Thou shalt not kill.Thou shalt not commit adultery.Thou shalt not steal.Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's.(4) The durable posters or framed copies donated or purchased under this subdivision shall be displayed in each:(A) Public institution of higher education and elementary and secondary school library and classroom in this state; and(B) Public building or facility in this state that is maintained or operated by taxpayer funds.(5) The copies or posters authorized under this subsection shall either be donated or shall be purchased solely with funds made available through voluntary contributions to the local school boards, local building governing entity, or the Building Authority.(6) If a copy or poster required under this subsection does not meet the requirements of this section, then an institution specified under this subsection may replace the copy or poster with a copy or poster that meets the requirements of this subsection:(A) With public funds; or(B) By accepting a private donation.(e) If an institution specified under this section has a copy or poster that is not needed for display, then the institution shall donate the copy or poster to another institution specified under this section.(f) The Department of Administration shall develop guidelines for display of the motto and POW-MIA flag.